District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1915

Tax on transfer of nonresidents’ real and personal property

Repealed.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 24, 33 DCR 7008

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 47-1911 to 47-1918.